California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Promptly after making its determination the department shall give to the person written notice of its estimate and determination, and of the penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 38.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [30241. - 30244.]

30241.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of tax required to be paid by any person under this part will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of tax, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30242.

If the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid within 10 days after service upon the person of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within the 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and interest provided in Article 6 of this chapter shall attach to the amount specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30243.

The person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter. They shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the department within 10 days after the service upon them of notice of the determination. The person shall at the time of filing the petition for redetermination deposit with the department such security as it may deem necessary to insure compliance with this part. The security may be sold by the department at public sale if it becomes necessary in order to recover any amount due under this part. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who deposited the security in the same manner as prescribed for service of notice by Section 30206. Upon any such sale, the surplus, if any, above the amount due under
 this part shall be returned to the person who deposited the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 39.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30243.5.

In accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive; or

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person; or

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person; or 

(d) To request a stay of collection activities.

The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 30243, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board
 may allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 30242 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

30244.

Any notice required by this article may be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 40.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [30261. - 30266.]

30261.

Any person against whom a determination is made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30201) or 3 (commencing with Section 30221) may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the person of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

30261.5.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 881.)
-------------------------------------------

30262.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in his petition, shall grant him an oral hearing and shall give him at least 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30263.

The order or decision of the department upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after serving of notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 41.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30264.

All determinations made by the board under Article 2 or 3 of this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30265.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 42.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30266.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but may increase the amount of the determination only if a claim for increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the 25 percent penalty imposed by Section 30205 or 30224 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase shall be asserted within eight years after the date the return for the period for which the increase is asserted is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [30281. - 30285.]

30281.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any tax, except a tax determined by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30201) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 30221), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax, in addition to the tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax became due and payable until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 30181 or Section 30183, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the tax for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30281.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of tax was made one business day after the date the tax was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of tax.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where no report or return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section shall only apply to electronic payments of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 26.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30282.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 30171, 30190, 30221, 30264, and 30281.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the
 department may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 30.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30283.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 30171, 30185, 30190, 30223, and 30281.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases their claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an
 area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 31.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30283.5.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

30284.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report, return, or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely report, return, or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified
 advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the
 board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 5.5.)
-------------------------------------------

30285.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return or report, or both, required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return or report, or both, and the
 understatement of tax liability is attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return or report, or both, was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other
 spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar months subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar month that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return or report due date for nonpayment on a return or report, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or report, or both, or an omission of an item from the return or report, or both, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a distributor of cigarettes or tobacco products or who sells or accepts orders for cigarettes or tobacco products to be transported to a consumer in this state from somewhere out of this state to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a distributor, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or
 credit to be entered on the return or report, or both.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities
 arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Collection of Tax [30301. - 30358.]



  ARTICLE 1. Suit for Tax [30301. - 30303.]

30301.

At any time within three years after any amount of tax becomes due and payable, and at any time within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board may transmit notice of the delinquency to the Attorney General, who shall at once proceed by appropriate legal action to collect all sums due the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

30302.

In the action a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

30303.

In the action a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the determination of the tax or the amount of the tax, of the delinquency of the amount of tax, interest, and penalty set forth, and of compliance by the board with all provisions of this part in relation to the computation and determination of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Notice to Withhold [30311. - 30316.]

30311.

If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by him or in the event a determination has been made against him which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment became delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the
 delinquent, or person against whom a determination has been made which remains unpaid, or owing any debts to the delinquent or such person. In the case of any state officer, department or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

30312.

After receiving the notice the persons so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30313.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all such credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If such notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of the deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of such bank at which such deposit is carried or at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect
 to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

30314.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld hereunder, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid he shall be liable to the State for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the State is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30315.

(a) The department may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a distributor, dealer, or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the distributor, dealer, or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing
 effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the distributor,
 dealer, or other person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the distributor, dealer, or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 32.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30316.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a distributor or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Section 30315 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence
 furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Priority and Lien of Tax [30321. - 30322.]

30321.

The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part together with interest and penalties shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of his assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

This section does not give the state a preference over any lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

The preference given to the state by this section shall be subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

30322.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts
 disclosed on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent;

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board;

(3) For amounts determined under Section 30241 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued; 

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Warrant for Collection of Tax [30341. - 30343.]

30341.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid, or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be
 levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30342.

The board shall pay the sheriff or marshal, upon the completion of his or her services pursuant to a warrant, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30343.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [30351. - 30354.7.]

30351.

The remedies of the State provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board or Attorney General constitutes an election by the State to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30352.

In all proceedings under this chapter the board may act on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30353.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30354.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any taxes due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the tax, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of taxes, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy.

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 30264.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30354.5.

The board, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 30354 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30354.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may
 provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This
 section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 6.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30354.7.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of tax, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.
